Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-121] Advisory board. The
commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, appoint a group of
individuals, to be known as the advisory board, to make recommendations to the
commissioner concerning any matter relating to the examinations provided for by
this article. Any individual appointed to the advisory board shall not be
entitled to any compensation for the individual's services. The commissioner
shall select a group that fairly represents the insurance industry in this
State. The commissioner shall decide how long each individual is to serve on
the advisory board. This section shall not be subject to the requirements of
chapter 92. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next